Utah statutes.
9-6-305.   Art collection committee.

(1)  The division shall appoint a committee of artists or judges of art to take charge of all works of art acquired under this chapter.  This collection shall be known as the Utah State Alice Art Collection.

(2) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (2)(b), as terms of current board members expire, the division shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the division shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.

(3)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(4)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

